Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8333.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-132. Special plate for the Dominican Independence and Heritage Award
Committee of RI.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity, the Dominican Independence
and Heritage Award Committee of RI. The plates shall be designed to reference the Dominican
Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI motor vehicle
plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Dominican
Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI in conjunction with the division of motor
vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.
(d) The Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI plates shall be

subject to compliance with § 31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates
per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Dominican
Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI plates shall not be issued unless the minimum
order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Dominican Independence and
Heritage Award Committee of RI and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for
production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the
division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Dominican
Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar
($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI
to provide funding for the Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI.
(h) A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Dominican
Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI plates, the Dominican Independence and
Heritage Award Committee of RI must use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit
of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.
(j) The Dominican Independence and Heritage Award Committee of RI will be required to
submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Dominican Independence and
Heritage Award Committee of RI plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC005031/SUB A
========
LC005031/SUB A - Page 2 of 3